Wyoming, session 2025, HB0225.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 31-5-513 is created to read:

31-5-513. Street parking during legislative meetings.

(a) No ordinance or regulation enacted pursuant to
W.S. 31-5-109(a) or 31-5-501 shall limit the duration of
parking on any street as follows:
HB0225

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0718

(i) Within the boundaries of the capitol complex
as defined in W.S. 9-5-101 during the period the state
legislature or any of its committees are actively meeting
at the capitol for official purposes; or

(ii) Within one-half (1/2) mile of the location
of official meetings of the state legislature, including
any of its committees, during the period the legislature or
committee is actively meeting.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0225